Illinois, session 104th, HB5122.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Vehicle Code is amended by 5changing Section 11-501 as follows: 6    (625 ILCS 5/11-501)  (from Ch. 95 1/2, par. 11-501)7    Sec. 11-501. Driving while under the influence of alcohol, 8other drug or drugs, intoxicating compound or compounds or any 9combination thereof. 10    (a) A person shall not drive or be in actual physical 11control of any vehicle within this State while:12        (1) the alcohol concentration in the person's blood, 13    other bodily substance, or breath is 0.08 or more based on 14    the definition of blood and breath units in Section 15    11-501.2;16        (2) under the influence of alcohol;17        (3) under the influence of any intoxicating compound 18    or combination of intoxicating compounds to a degree that 19    renders the person incapable of driving safely;20        (4) under the influence of any other drug or 21    combination of drugs to a degree that renders the person 22    incapable of safely driving;23        (5) under the combined influence of alcohol, other   HB5122- 2 -LRB104 19780 LNS 33230 b1    drug or drugs, or intoxicating compound or compounds to a 2    degree that renders the person incapable of safely 3    driving;4        (6) there is any amount of a drug, substance, or 5    compound in the person's breath, blood, other bodily 6    substance, or urine resulting from the unlawful use or 7    consumption of a controlled substance listed in the 8    Illinois Controlled Substances Act, an intoxicating 9    compound listed in the Use of Intoxicating Compounds Act, 10    or methamphetamine as listed in the Methamphetamine 11    Control and Community Protection Act; or12        (7) the person has, within 2 hours of driving or being 13    in actual physical control of a vehicle, a 14    tetrahydrocannabinol concentration in the person's whole 15    blood or other bodily substance as defined in paragraph 6 16    of subsection (a) of Section 11-501.2 of this Code. 17    Subject to all other requirements and provisions under 18    this Section, this paragraph (7) does not apply to the 19    lawful consumption of cannabis by a qualifying patient 20    licensed under the Compassionate Use of Medical Cannabis 21    Program Act who is in possession of a valid registry card 22    issued under that Act, unless that person is impaired by 23    the use of cannabis.24    (b) The fact that any person charged with violating this 25Section is or has been legally entitled to use alcohol, 26cannabis under the Compassionate Use of Medical Cannabis   HB5122- 3 -LRB104 19780 LNS 33230 b1Program Act, other drug or drugs, or intoxicating compound or 2compounds, or any combination thereof, shall not constitute a 3defense against any charge of violating this Section.4    (c) Penalties.5        (1) Except as otherwise provided in this Section, any 6    person convicted of violating subsection (a) of this 7    Section is guilty of a Class A misdemeanor.8        (2) A person who violates subsection (a) or a similar 9    provision a second time shall be sentenced to a mandatory 10    minimum term of either 5 days of imprisonment or 240 hours 11    of community service in addition to any other criminal or 12    administrative sanction.13        (3) A person who violates subsection (a) is subject to 14    6 months of imprisonment, an additional mandatory minimum 15    fine of $1,000, and 25 days of community service in a 16    program benefiting children if the person was transporting 17    a person under the age of 16 at the time of the violation.18        (4) A person who violates subsection (a) a first time, 19    if the alcohol concentration in his or her blood, breath, 20    other bodily substance, or urine was 0.16 or more based on 21    the definition of blood, breath, other bodily substance, 22    or urine units in Section 11-501.2, shall be subject, in 23    addition to any other penalty that may be imposed, to a 24    mandatory minimum of 100 hours of community service and a 25    mandatory minimum fine of $500.26        (5) A person who violates subsection (a) a second   HB5122- 4 -LRB104 19780 LNS 33230 b1    time, if at the time of the second violation the alcohol 2    concentration in his or her blood, breath, other bodily 3    substance, or urine was 0.16 or more based on the 4    definition of blood, breath, other bodily substance, or 5    urine units in Section 11-501.2, shall be subject, in 6    addition to any other penalty that may be imposed, to a 7    mandatory minimum of 2 days of imprisonment and a 8    mandatory minimum fine of $1,250.9    (d) Aggravated driving under the influence of alcohol, 10other drug or drugs, or intoxicating compound or compounds, or 11any combination thereof. 12        (1) Every person convicted of committing a violation 13    of this Section shall be guilty of aggravated driving 14    under the influence of alcohol, other drug or drugs, or 15    intoxicating compound or compounds, or any combination 16    thereof if:17            (A) the person committed a violation of subsection 18        (a) or a similar provision for the third or subsequent 19        time;20            (B) the person committed a violation of subsection 21        (a) while driving a school bus with one or more 22        passengers on board;23            (C) the person in committing a violation of 24        subsection (a) was involved in a motor vehicle crash 25        that resulted in great bodily harm or permanent 26        disability or disfigurement to another, when the   HB5122- 5 -LRB104 19780 LNS 33230 b1        violation was a proximate cause of the injuries;2            (D) the person committed a violation of subsection 3        (a) and has been previously convicted of violating 4        Section 9-3 of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the 5        Criminal Code of 2012 or a similar provision of a law 6        of another state relating to reckless homicide in 7        which the person was determined to have been under the 8        influence of alcohol, other drug or drugs, or 9        intoxicating compound or compounds as an element of 10        the offense or the person has previously been 11        convicted under subparagraph (C) or subparagraph (F) 12        of this paragraph (1);13            (E) the person, in committing a violation of 14        subsection (a) while driving at any speed in a school 15        speed zone at a time when a speed limit of 20 miles per 16        hour was in effect under subsection (a) of Section 17        11-605 of this Code, was involved in a motor vehicle 18        crash that resulted in bodily harm, other than great 19        bodily harm or permanent disability or disfigurement, 20        to another person, when the violation of subsection 21        (a) was a proximate cause of the bodily harm;22            (F) the person, in committing a violation of 23        subsection (a), was involved in a motor vehicle crash 24        or snowmobile, all-terrain vehicle, or watercraft 25        accident that resulted in the death of another person, 26        when the violation of subsection (a) was a proximate   HB5122- 6 -LRB104 19780 LNS 33230 b1        cause of the death;2            (G) the person committed a violation of subsection 3        (a) during a period in which the defendant's driving 4        privileges are revoked or suspended, where the 5        revocation or suspension was for a violation of 6        subsection (a) or a similar provision, Section 7        11-501.1, paragraph (b) of Section 11-401, or for 8        reckless homicide as defined in Section 9-3 of the 9        Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012;10            (H) the person committed the violation while he or 11        she did not possess a driver's license or permit or a 12        restricted driving permit or a judicial driving permit 13        or a monitoring device driving permit;14            (I) the person committed the violation while he or 15        she knew or should have known that the vehicle he or 16        she was driving was not covered by a liability 17        insurance policy;18            (J) the person in committing a violation of 19        subsection (a) was involved in a motor vehicle crash 20        that resulted in bodily harm, but not great bodily 21        harm, to the child under the age of 16 being 22        transported by the person, if the violation was the 23        proximate cause of the injury; 24            (K) the person in committing a second violation of 25        subsection (a) or a similar provision was transporting 26        a person under the age of 16; or  HB5122- 7 -LRB104 19780 LNS 33230 b1            (L) the person committed a violation of subsection 2        (a) of this Section while transporting one or more 3        passengers in a vehicle for-hire; or . 4            (M) the person committed a first or subsequent 5        violation of subsection (a) and has been previously 6        convicted of violating Section 5-16 of the Boat 7        Registration and Safety Act. 8        (2)(A) Except as provided otherwise, a person 9    convicted of aggravated driving under the influence of 10    alcohol, other drug or drugs, or intoxicating compound or 11    compounds, or any combination thereof is guilty of a Class 12    4 felony.13        (B) A third violation of this Section or a similar 14    provision is a Class 2 felony. If at the time of the third 15    violation the alcohol concentration in his or her blood, 16    breath, other bodily substance, or urine was 0.16 or more 17    based on the definition of blood, breath, other bodily 18    substance, or urine units in Section 11-501.2, a mandatory 19    minimum of 90 days of imprisonment and a mandatory minimum 20    fine of $2,500 shall be imposed in addition to any other 21    criminal or administrative sanction. If at the time of the 22    third violation, the defendant was transporting a person 23    under the age of 16, a mandatory fine of $25,000 and 25 24    days of community service in a program benefiting children 25    shall be imposed in addition to any other criminal or 26    administrative sanction.  HB5122- 8 -LRB104 19780 LNS 33230 b1        (C) A fourth violation of this Section or a similar 2    provision is a Class 2 felony, for which a sentence of 3    probation or conditional discharge may not be imposed. If 4    at the time of the violation, the alcohol concentration in 5    the defendant's blood, breath, other bodily substance, or 6    urine was 0.16 or more based on the definition of blood, 7    breath, other bodily substance, or urine units in Section 8    11-501.2, a mandatory minimum fine of $5,000 shall be 9    imposed in addition to any other criminal or 10    administrative sanction. If at the time of the fourth 11    violation, the defendant was transporting a person under 12    the age of 16 a mandatory fine of $25,000 and 25 days of 13    community service in a program benefiting children shall 14    be imposed in addition to any other criminal or 15    administrative sanction.16        (D) A fifth violation of this Section or a similar 17    provision is a Class 1 felony, for which a sentence of 18    probation or conditional discharge may not be imposed. If 19    at the time of the violation, the alcohol concentration in 20    the defendant's blood, breath, other bodily substance, or 21    urine was 0.16 or more based on the definition of blood, 22    breath, other bodily substance, or urine units in Section 23    11-501.2, a mandatory minimum fine of $5,000 shall be 24    imposed in addition to any other criminal or 25    administrative sanction. If at the time of the fifth 26    violation, the defendant was transporting a person under   HB5122- 9 -LRB104 19780 LNS 33230 b1    the age of 16, a mandatory fine of $25,000, and 25 days of 2    community service in a program benefiting children shall 3    be imposed in addition to any other criminal or 4    administrative sanction.5        (E) A sixth or subsequent violation of this Section or 6    similar provision is a Class X felony. If at the time of 7    the violation, the alcohol concentration in the 8    defendant's blood, breath, other bodily substance, or 9    urine was 0.16 or more based on the definition of blood, 10    breath, other bodily substance, or urine units in Section 11    11-501.2, a mandatory minimum fine of $5,000 shall be 12    imposed in addition to any other criminal or 13    administrative sanction. If at the time of the violation, 14    the defendant was transporting a person under the age of 15    16, a mandatory fine of $25,000 and 25 days of community 16    service in a program benefiting children shall be imposed 17    in addition to any other criminal or administrative 18    sanction.19        (F) For a violation of subparagraph (C) of paragraph 20    (1) of this subsection (d), the defendant, if sentenced to 21    a term of imprisonment, shall be sentenced to not less 22    than one year nor more than 12 years.23        (G) A violation of subparagraph (F) of paragraph (1) 24    of this subsection (d) is a Class 2 felony, for which the 25    defendant, unless the court determines that extraordinary 26    circumstances exist and require probation, shall be   HB5122- 10 -LRB104 19780 LNS 33230 b1    sentenced to: (i) a term of imprisonment of not less than 3 2    years and not more than 14 years if the violation resulted 3    in the death of one person; or (ii) a term of imprisonment 4    of not less than 6 years and not more than 28 years if the 5    violation resulted in the deaths of 2 or more persons.6        (H) For a violation of subparagraph (J) of paragraph 7    (1) of this subsection (d), a mandatory fine of $2,500, 8    and 25 days of community service in a program benefiting 9    children shall be imposed in addition to any other 10    criminal or administrative sanction.11        (I) A violation of subparagraph (K) of paragraph (1) 12    of this subsection (d), is a Class 2 felony and a mandatory 13    fine of $2,500, and 25 days of community service in a 14    program benefiting children shall be imposed in addition 15    to any other criminal or administrative sanction. If the 16    child being transported suffered bodily harm, but not 17    great bodily harm, in a motor vehicle crash, and the 18    violation was the proximate cause of that injury, a 19    mandatory fine of $5,000 and 25 days of community service 20    in a program benefiting children shall be imposed in 21    addition to any other criminal or administrative sanction.22        (J) A violation of subparagraph (D) of paragraph (1) 23    of this subsection (d) is a Class 3 felony, for which a 24    sentence of probation or conditional discharge may not be 25    imposed. 26        (3) Any person sentenced under this subsection (d) who   HB5122- 11 -LRB104 19780 LNS 33230 b1    receives a term of probation or conditional discharge must 2    serve a minimum term of either 480 hours of community 3    service or 10 days of imprisonment as a condition of the 4    probation or conditional discharge in addition to any 5    other criminal or administrative sanction.6    (e) Any reference to a prior violation of subsection (a) 7or a similar provision includes any violation of a provision 8of a local ordinance or a provision of a law of another state 9or an offense committed on a military installation that is 10similar to a violation of subsection (a) of this Section.11    (f) The imposition of a mandatory term of imprisonment or 12assignment of community service for a violation of this 13Section shall not be suspended or reduced by the court.14    (g) Any penalty imposed for driving with a license that 15has been revoked for a previous violation of subsection (a) of 16this Section shall be in addition to the penalty imposed for 17any subsequent violation of subsection (a).18    (h) For any prosecution under this Section, a certified 19copy of the driving abstract of the defendant shall be 20admitted as proof of any prior conviction. 21(Source: P.A. 101-363, eff. 8-9-19; 102-982, eff. 7-1-23.)